Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska51-210
Library board; building sites; acquisition; procedure.

Every library board created under sections 51-201 to 51-219 shall have power to purchase or lease grounds, to exercise the power of eminent domain, and to condemn real estate for the purpose of securing a site for a library building. The procedure to condemn property shall be exercised in the manner set forth in sections 76-704 to 76-724.

Laws 1911, c. 73, § 6, p. 316;

R.S.1913, § 3797;

Laws 1917, c. 86, § 1, p. 223;

C.S.1922, § 3190;

C.S.1929, § 51-206;

R.S.1943, § 51-210;

Laws 1951, c. 101, § 100, p. 494;

Laws 1971, LB 560, § 1;

Laws 1997, LB 250, § 21.